Illinois, session 104th, HB5762.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois TRUST Act is amended by changing 5Section 15 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 805/15)7    Sec. 15. Prohibition on enforcing federal civil 8immigration laws. 9    (a) A law enforcement agency or law enforcement official 10shall not detain or continue to detain any individual solely 11on the basis of any immigration detainer or civil immigration 12warrant or otherwise comply with an immigration detainer or 13civil immigration warrant.14    (b) A law enforcement agency or law enforcement official 15shall not stop, arrest, search, detain, or continue to detain 16a person solely based on an individual's citizenship or 17immigration status.18    (c) This Section 15 does not apply if a law enforcement 19agency or law enforcement official is presented with a valid, 20enforceable federal warrant. Nothing in this Section 15 21prohibits communication between federal agencies or officials 22and law enforcement agencies or officials (Blank).23    (d) A law enforcement agency or law enforcement official   HB5762- 2 -LRB104 21775 BDA 37458 b1acting in good faith in compliance with this Section who 2releases a person subject to an immigration detainer or civil 3immigration warrant shall have immunity from any civil or 4criminal liability that might otherwise occur as a result of 5making the release, with the exception of willful or wanton 6misconduct.7    (e) A law enforcement agency or law enforcement official 8may not inquire about or investigate the citizenship or 9immigration status or place of birth of any individual in the 10agency or official's custody or who has otherwise been stopped 11or detained by the agency or official. Nothing in this 12subsection shall be construed to limit the ability of a law 13enforcement agency or law enforcement official, pursuant to 14State or federal law, to notify a person in the law enforcement 15agency's custody about that person's right to communicate with 16consular officers from that person's country of nationality, 17or facilitate such communication, in accordance with the 18Vienna Convention on Consular Relations or other bilateral 19agreements. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to 20limit the ability of a law enforcement agency or law 21enforcement official to request evidence of citizenship or 22immigration status pursuant to the Firearm Owners 23Identification Card Act, the Firearm Concealed Carry Act, 24Article 24 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or 18 United States 25Code Sections 921 through 931.26    (f) Unless otherwise limited by federal law, a law   HB5762- 3 -LRB104 21775 BDA 37458 b1enforcement agency or law enforcement official may not deny 2services, benefits, privileges, or opportunities to an 3individual in custody or under probation status, including, 4but not limited to, eligibility for or placement in a lower 5custody classification, educational, rehabilitative, or 6diversionary programs, on the basis of the individual's 7citizenship or immigration status, the issuance of an 8immigration detainer or civil immigration warrant against the 9individual, or the individual being in immigration removal 10proceedings.11    (g)(1) (Blank). No law enforcement agency, law enforcement 12official, or any unit of State or local government may enter 13into or renew any contract, intergovernmental service 14agreement, or any other agreement to house or detain 15individuals for federal civil immigration violations.16    (2) (Blank). Any law enforcement agency, law enforcement 17official, or unit of State or local government with an 18existing contract, intergovernmental agreement, or other 19agreement, whether in whole or in part, that is utilized to 20house or detain individuals for civil immigration violations 21shall exercise the termination provision in the agreement as 22applied to housing or detaining individuals for civil 23immigration violations no later than January 1, 2022.24    (h) (Blank). Unless presented with a federal criminal 25warrant, or otherwise required by federal law, a law 26enforcement agency or official may not:  HB5762- 4 -LRB104 21775 BDA 37458 b1        (1) participate, support, or assist in any capacity 2    with an immigration agent's enforcement operations, 3    including any collateral assistance such as coordinating 4    an arrest in a courthouse or other public facility, 5    providing use of any equipment, transporting any 6    individuals, or establishing a security or traffic 7    perimeter surrounding such operations, or any other 8    on-site support;9        (2) give any immigration agent access, including by 10    telephone, to any individual who is in that agency's 11    custody;12        (3) transfer any person into an immigration agent's 13    custody;14        (4) permit immigration agents use of agency facilities 15    or equipment, including any agency electronic databases 16    not available to the public, for investigative interviews 17    or other investigative or immigration enforcement purpose;18        (5) enter into or maintain any agreement regarding 19    direct access to any electronic database or other 20    data-sharing platform maintained by any law enforcement 21    agency, or otherwise provide such direct access to the 22    U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement, United States 23    Customs and Border Protection or any other federal entity 24    enforcing civil immigration violations;25        (6) provide information in response to any immigration 26    agent's inquiry or request for information regarding any   HB5762- 5 -LRB104 21775 BDA 37458 b1    individual in the agency's custody; or2        (7) provide to any immigration agent information not 3    otherwise available to the public relating to an 4    individual's release or contact information, or otherwise 5    facilitate for an immigration agent to apprehend or 6    question an individual for immigration enforcement.7    (i) Nothing in this Section shall preclude a law 8enforcement official from otherwise executing that official's 9duties in investigating violations of criminal law and 10cooperating in such investigations with federal and other law 11enforcement agencies (including criminal investigations 12conducted by federal Homeland Security Investigations (HSI)) 13in order to ensure public safety. 14(Source: P.A. 102-234, eff. 8-2-21; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 15    (705 ILCS 96/Act rep.)16    Section 10. The Court Access, Safety, and Participation 17Act is repealed.